Maryland, session 2026, SB0564.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
SUBTITLE 10. DIVISION OF DATA PROTECTION.
6–1001.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0564*

SENATE BILL 564
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “DIVISION” MEANS THE DIVISION OF DATA PROTECTION.
(C) “VIOLATION” MEANS A VIOLATION OF:
(1) SECTION 13–310.1 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE;
(2) (1) TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 47 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW
ARTICLE; OR
(3) (2) TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 48 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW
ARTICLE.
6–1002.
THERE IS A DIVISION OF DATA PROTECTION IN THE OFFICE.
6–1003.
(A) THE FUNCTION OF THE DIVISION IS TO INVESTIGATE AND BRING CIVIL
ACTIONS RELATED TO VIOLATIONS.
(B) THE DIVISION SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) A FULL–TIME CHIEF COUNSEL OF DATA PROTECTION; AND
(2) STAFF, INCLUDING ASSISTANT ATTORNEYS GENERAL,
INVESTIGATORS, AND ADMINISTRATORS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) There is a Maryland Data Privacy Implementation and Innovation
Workgroup.
(b) The Workgroup consists of the following members:
(1) one member of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) one member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;

SENATE BILL 564 3
(3) the Attorney General, or a designee from the Attorney General who
represents the Division of Data Protection;
(4) the Secretary of Information Technology, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) the Secretary of Commerce, or the Secretary’s designee;
(6) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
(i) one consumer privacy advocate from a nonprofit or academic
institution;
(ii) one civil rights or civil liberties advocate with privacy expertise;
(iii) one representative of a Maryland–based small business;
(iv) one representative of the digital advertising industry; and
(v) one representative of industry with experience in data
governance, cybersecurity, or compliance; and
(7) five members, appointed jointly by the President of the Senate and the
Speaker of the House, representing a variety of stakeholder perspectives, including
consumer advocates, technical experts, and regulated industry sectors.
(c) The members of the Workgroup shall elect a chair from among the members
of the Workgroup.
(d) The Office of the Attorney General shall provide staff for the Workgroup.
(e) A member of the Workgroup:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Workgroup; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Workgroup shall:
(1) study Maryland’s consumer data privacy framework and evaluate
implementation issues, focused on the following areas:
(i) data minimization;
(ii) compliance challenges faced by businesses;
(iii) privacy law updates in other states;

SENATE BILL 564
(iv) enforcement capacity and funding, including staffing and
operational needs; and
(v) artificial intelligence and privacy, including how artificial
intelligence systems build on personal data and how privacy protections should apply on
emerging contexts; and
(2) make recommendations for legislative or policy changes to make
technical clarifications or improvements while maintaining strong consumer protections.
(g) On or before January 1, 2027, the Workgroup shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of
June 30, 2027, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required by the General
Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.